New York, session 2025-2026, A3066.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature hereby finds that 2 total release pesticide foggers, otherwise known as "bug bombs," present 3 a dangerous health risk to communities. They fill an area with insecti- 4 cide by releasing the complete pressurized contents of cans in a widely 5 distributed fine mist. Adverse health effects to total release foggers 6 are frequent and exposures to insecticidal foggers are more likely to 7 result in adverse health outcomes, such as pesticide poisoning and asth- 8 ma, than exposures to other pesticide products. Restricting the sale of 9 pesticide foggers to consumers will reduce their use by ensuring only 10 personnel trained to understand and follow the restrictions will apply 11 them. Furthermore, eliminating their use in multi-unit buildings will 12 protect the health and well-being of residents of those buildings from 13 dangerous effects of these products. 14 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 33-1301 of the environmental conserva- 15 tion law is amended by adding a new paragraph f to read as follows: 16 f. Any pesticide classified as a total release fogging pesticide, 17 unless: 18 (1) the purchaser is licensed as a certified commercial pesticide 19 applicator, certified residential pesticide applicator, or certified 20 commercial pesticide technician in the state of New York; or 21 (2) the purchaser is licensed in an equivalent manner in a jurisdic- 22 tion with reciprocity with the state of New York, as determined by the 23 department. 24 § 3. Section 33-1301 of the environmental conservation law is amended 25 by adding a new subdivision 14 to read as follows: 26 14. For any person to use any pesticide classified as a total release 27 fogging pesticide in multi-unit dwellings. 28 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06345-01-5